Colorado statutes. TITLE 36 Natural Resources - General
ARTICLE 2
RIGHTS OF OCCUPANTS

Cross references:

For locating mining claims, see article 43 of title 34.

Section

36-2-101. Right of citizens claiming.

Conceding to the United States the primary and paramount right to dispose of the soil of this state, according to the laws existing or to be enacted by congress, and full and complete exemption from every form of taxation of their property, it is hereby declared that as between all the good citizens residing in this state, and as between them, or any of them, and others, having or claiming, or pretending to have or claim, any right to occupy, possess, and enjoy any portion of the public domain situate within the boundaries of this state, and as between each and every one of them, and all other persons, associations, corporations, and powers except the government of the United States, the right as the same may exist under the local laws, to occupy, possess, and enjoy any tract or portion thereof, shall be respected in law in all the courts and tribunals of this state.

Source:

R.S.

p. 531, § 1.

G.L.

§ 2124.

G.S.

§ 2674.

R.S. 08:

§ 5120.

C.L.

§ 1103.

CSA:

C. 134, § 1.

CRS 53:

§ 112-1-1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 112-1-1.

36-2-102. Declaration of occupation.

All rights of occupancy, possession, and enjoyment of any tract or portion of the public domain, except mining claims, acquired after January 10, 1868, shall be expressed and described in a declaration, in cases of original occupation, and by a deed in cases of purchase, duly acknowledged by some officer authorized to take acknowledgments of deeds, and recorded in the office of the recorder of the county in which the land is situated.

Source:

R.S.

p. 531, § 2.

G.L.

§ 2125.

G.S.

§ 2675.

R.S. 08:

§ 5121.

C.L.

§ 1104.

CSA:

C. 134, § 2.

CRS 53:

§ 112-1-2.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 112-1-2.

36-2-103. Interest transferable.

The owner of every claim or improvement, on every tract or parcel of land, has a transferable interest therein, which may be sold in execution or otherwise. Any sale of such improvement is a sufficient consideration to sustain a promise.

Source:

R.S.

p. 531, § 3.

G.L.

§ 2126.

G.S.

§ 2676.

R.S. 08:

§ 5122.

C.L.

§ 1105.

CSA:

C. 134, § 3.

CRS 53:

§ 112-1-3.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 112-1-3.

36-2-104. Rights acquired before and after November 7, 1861.

All rights of occupancy, possession, and enjoyment of any tract or portion of the public domain, acquired before November 7, 1861, shall be ascertained, adjudged, and determined by the local law of the district or precinct in which the tract is situated, as it existed on the day when such rights were acquired, or as it thereafter has existed; and if there were no local laws at that time, then by the common custom then prevailing in respect to such property in the district or precinct in which it existed. All such rights of occupancy, possession, and enjoyment, acquired since November 7, 1861, shall be ascertained, adjudged, and determined by the laws of this state in force at the date of such acquisition.

Source:

R.S.

p. 531, § 4.

G.L.

§ 2127.

G.S.

§ 2677.

R.S. 08:

§ 5123.

C.L.

§ 1106.

CSA:

C. 134, § 4.

CRS 53:

§ 112-1-4.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 112-1-4.

36-2-105. Form of declaration of occupant.

The declaration by an occupant of a tract or portion of the public domain, required by section 36-2-102, shall be substantially in the following form:

To all whom these presents may concern:
Know ye, That I, A.B., of ............, in the county of ............, in the state of Colorado, do hereby declare and publish as a legal notice to all the world, that I have a valid right to the occupation, possession, and enjoyment of all and singular that tract or parcel of land, not exceeding one hundred and sixty acres, situate in the township of ............, in the county of .............., in the state of Colorado, bounded and described as follows:
(Here insert the description) together with all and singular the hereditaments and appurtenances thereunto belonging or in anywise appertaining.
Witness my hand and seal, this ............ day of ............, 20 ........(To be subscribed with the full first name and surname of the person making the application, and acknowledged in the same manner as a deed of real estate.)

Source:

R.S.

p. 532, § 5.

G.L.

§ 2128.

G.S.

§ 2678.

R.S. 08:

§ 5124.

C.L.

§ 1107.

CSA:

C. 134, § 5.

CRS 53:

§ 112-1-5.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 112-1-5.

L. 73:

p. 612, § 3.

Cross references:

For acknowledgment of a deed of real estate, see article 35 of title 38.

36-2-106. Effect of declaration or deed.

In all proceedings in any court of this state, the record of any declaration, deed, or mortgage, or other muniments of right, referred to in sections 36-2-103 and 36-2-105, shall be received, except as against the United States, and all persons claiming under the United States, as presumptive evidence of the regularity of the paper itself, under the local law or custom existing at the time of its execution; and, if the regularity thereof is challenged, the burden of proving the alleged irregularity shall rest upon the party making the challenge.

Source:

R.S.

p. 532, § 6.

G.L.

§ 2129.

G.S.

§ 2679.

R.S. 08:

§ 5125.

C.L.

§ 1108.

CSA:

C. 134, § 6.

CRS 53:

§ 112-1-6.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 112-1-6.

36-2-107. Declaration not to include mines.

The declaration of every occupant of any tract or portion of the public domain, mentioned in section 36-2-105, shall not be construed to include any gold-bearing quartz lodes, silver lode, or gold diggings; but said lodes and diggings shall be excepted from the tract of said occupant and shall be subject to be occupied, possessed, and enjoyed as provided in section 36-2-115.

Source:

R.S.

p. 532, § 7.

G.L.

§ 2130.

G.S.

§ 2680.

R.S. 08:

§ 5126.

C.L.

§ 1109.

CSA:

C. 134, § 7.

CRS 53:

§ 112-1-7.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 112-1-7.

Cross references:

For lode claims, see article 43 of title 34.

36-2-108. Settler may maintain trespass.

Any person settled upon any of the public lands belonging to the United States may maintain trespass, ejectment, forcible entry and detainer, unlawful detainer, and forcible detainer for injuries done to the possession thereof.

Source:

R.S.

p. 532, § 8.

G.L.

§ 2131.

G.S.

§ 2681.

R.S. 08:

§ 5127.

C.L.

§ 1110.

CSA:

C. 134, § 8.

CRS 53:

§ 112-1-8.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 112-1-8.

Cross references:

For marking of claims, see § 36-2-110; for paramount right of United States, see § 36-2-113.

36-2-109. Inclosure not necessary in suit.

On the trial of any such cause the possession or possessory right of the plaintiff shall be considered as extending to the boundaries embraced by the claim of such plaintiff, so as to enable him to have and maintain any of the actions provided in section 36-2-108, without being compelled to prove an actual inclosure; but each claim shall not exceed in any case one hundred and sixty acres of land.

Source:

R.S.

p. 533, § 9.

G.L.

§ 2132.

G.S.

§ 2682.

R.S. 08:

§ 5128.

C.L.

§ 1111.

CSA:

C. 134, § 9.

CRS 53:

§ 112-1-9.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 112-1-9.

36-2-110. Claim must be marked.

Every claim, to entitle the holder to maintain any of the actions stated in section 36-2-108, shall be marked out so that the boundaries may be readily traced and the extent of such claim easily known. No person shall be entitled to maintain any of the actions for possession of, or injury done to, any claim unless he occupies the same or makes improvements thereon to the value of one hundred dollars.

Source:

R.S.

p. 533, § 10.

G.L.

§ 2133.

G.S.

§ 2683.

R.S. 08:

§ 5129.

C.L.

§ 1112.

CSA:

C. 134, § 10.

CRS 53:

§ 112-1-10.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 112-1-10.

Cross references:

For applicability of section, see § 36-2-114.

36-2-111. Neglect to occupy - fence - plow.

A neglect to occupy the claim, or to inclose at least five acres with a reasonable fence, or to plow at least five acres of the same for the period of six months shall be considered such an abandonment as to preclude the claimant from maintaining any of the actions stated in section 36-2-108.

Source:

R.S.

p. 533, § 11.

G.L.

§ 2134.

G.S.

§ 2684.

R.S. 08:

§ 5130.

C.L.

§ 1113.

CSA:

C. 134, § 11.

CRS 53:

§ 112-1-11.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 112-1-11.

Cross references:

For applicability of section, see § 36-2-114.

36-2-112. Town lots - abandonment - mining districts.

Any person who has a title to occupy any lot within any city or village plot, or any lots or mining claim within any mining district in this state by virtue of a certificate, deed of gift or purchase from the original claimant, or his assigns, as well as all purchasers, under any decree or execution of any of the so-called provisional government courts, people's or miners' courts, of the lands situate within any city or village plot, or any lots, lands, or mining claims situate within any mining district, together with the original claimant of the lots, lands, or mining claims, shall be entitled to maintain the actions authorized by section 36-2-108 against any person who enters upon and occupies the lots, lands, or mining claims, or any of them. It is lawful for the citizens of mining districts to declare an abandonment of any creek, river, gulch, bank, or mining claim a forfeiture of the rights of the claimants thereto; in which case the parties claimant shall not be enabled to maintain any of the actions mentioned in section 36-2-108.

Source:

R.S.

p. 533, § 12.

G.L.

§ 2135.

G.S.

§ 2685.

R.S. 08:

§ 5131.

C.L.

§ 1114.

CSA:

C. 134, § 12.

CRS 53:

§ 112-1-12.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 112-1-12.

36-2-113. Right of United States not denied.

Nothing in this article shall be construed to deny the right of the United States to dispose of any lands in this state; nor shall the fact that the title to any lots, lands, lodes, or mining claims has not passed from the United States be any bar to the recovery of the plaintiff in any of the actions specified in section 36-2-108. As against the United States, and all persons holding any of the lands under the United States, or the laws thereof, this article shall be ineffective and void.

Source:

R.S.

p. 533, § 13.

G.L.

§ 2136.

G.S.

§ 2686.

R.S. 08:

§ 5132.

C.L.

§ 1115.

CSA:

C. 134, § 13.

CRS 53:

§ 112-1-13.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 112-1-13.

36-2-114. Mining claims not affected.

Sections 36-2-110 and 36-2-111 are not intended and shall not be construed to affect or apply to mining claims but shall affect and be applicable to claims held or used for arable or pastoral agriculture only.

Source:

R.S.

p. 534, § 14.

G.L.

§ 2137.

G.S.

§ 2687.

R.S. 08:

§ 5133.

C.L.

§ 1116.

CSA:

C. 134, § 14.

CRS 53:

§ 112-1-14.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 112-1-14.

36-2-115. Mining under claim - bond - damages.

When any improvements are made upon any claim held or used for arable or pastoral agriculture or upon any building lot, mill site, or other lot or premises and any person demands of the claimant to mine any portion of the claim upon which such improvements have been made, it is lawful for the occupant or holder of the claim to require a good and sufficient bond, in a sum double the value of the improvements upon the land sought to be mined, from the party demanding to mine upon the claim, with two or more sureties, to be approved by the county court of the county in which the claim is situate conditioned that the party shall pay all damage which may be sustained by the occupant or holder of such claim to the improvements thereon.

Source:

R.S.

p. 534, § 15.

G.L.

§ 2138.

G.S.

§ 2688.

R.S. 08:

§ 5134.

C.L.

§ 1117.

CSA:

C. 134, § 15.

CRS 53:

§ 112-1-15.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 112-1-16.

L. 64:

p. 301, § 257.

36-2-116. Assessment of damage to improvements.

It is the duty of the county judge, by whom the bond is required to be approved in case the value of the improvements cannot be agreed upon by the claimant and the party seeking to mine, to appoint a day and hour to hear testimony respecting the value of the improvements which may be damaged by reason of such mining.

Source:

R.S.

p. 534, § 16.

G.L.

§ 2139.

G.S.

§ 2689.

R.S. 08:

§ 5135.

C.L.

§ 1118.

CSA:

C. 134, § 16.

CRS 53:

§ 112-1-16.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 112-1-16.

L. 64:

p. 301, § 257.

36-2-117. Justification of sureties.

It is the duty of the county judge to require the sureties entering into such bond to justify before him, each in the sum stated in the bond. If the claimant excepts to the sureties, or either of them, it is lawful for the judge, and he is required, to examine the sureties excepted to on oath, touching the sufficiency of said sureties; and, if the judge finds any of the sureties insufficient, it is the duty of the judge to require further sufficient sureties, which shall be likewise approved and justified.

Source:

R.S.

p. 534, § 17.

G.L.

§ 2140.

G.S.

§ 2690.

R.S. 08:

§ 5136.

C.L.

§ 1119.

CSA:

C. 134, § 17.

CRS 53:

§ 112-1-17.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 112-1-17.

L. 64:

p. 301, § 258.

36-2-118. Weekly demand of damages.

It shall be competent for the claimant to demand from the obligees in the bond, at any time after one week after mining is commenced on the claim, such sum as may be equal to the damage done to the improvements thereon, and after every week it shall be competent for the claimant to make a like demand, unless the payment of the damage done or to be done to the improvements shall by the claimant be postponed for a longer time.

Source:

R.S.

p. 534, § 18.

G.L.

§ 2141.

G.S.

§ 2691.

R.S. 08:

§ 5137.

C.L.

§ 1120.

CSA:

C. 134, § 18.

CRS 53:

§ 112-1-18.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 112-1-18.